Utah statutes.
41-6a-308.   Lane use control signals -- Colors.
The operator of a vehicle facing a traffic-control signal placed to control
individual lane use shall obey the signal as follows:
(1)  Green signal -- vehicular traffic may travel in any lane over which a
green signal is shown.
(2)  Steady yellow signal -- vehicular traffic is warned that a lane control
change is being made.
(3)  Steady red signal -- vehicular traffic may not enter or travel in any
lane over which a red signal is shown.
(4)  Flashing yellow signal -- vehicular traffic may use the lane only for the
purpose of approaching and making a left turn.
